Washington statutes.
RCW 7.24.130

"Person" defined.

The word "person" wherever used in this chapter, shall be construed to mean any person, partnership, joint stock company, unincorporated association or society, or municipal or other corporation of any character whatsoever.

[ 1935 c 113 s 13; RRS s 784-13.]